District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0671.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
50 act may be cited as the “Protecting Victims Amendment Act of 2026”.
51 Sec. 2. Chapter 10 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
52 follows:
53 (a) Section 16-1005 is amended as follows
54 (1) Paragraph (f)(2) is amended by striking the word “both” and inserting the
55 phrase “both, except as set forth in subsection (g-1) of this section” in its place.
56 (2) Paragraph (g)(1) is amended by striking the word “misdemeanor” and
57 inserting the phrase “misdemeanor, except as set forth in subsection (g-1) of this section” in its
58 place.
59 (3) Paragraph (g)(2) is amended by striking the word “both” and inserting the
60 phrase “both, except as set forth in subsection (g-1)” in its place.
61 (4) Subsection (g-1) is redesignated as subsection (g-3)
62 (5) New subsections (g-1) and (g-2) are added to read as follows:
63 “(g-1) A person convicted under subsection (f) or (g) of this section who has one or more
64 prior convictions pursuant to subsections (f) and (g) of this section, not committed on the same
65 occasion, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in D.C. Official Code § 22-3571.01
66 and imprisoned for a mandatory minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of
67 not more than 5 years, or both. A person sentenced under this subsection shall not be released
68 from prison, granted probation, or granted suspension of sentence, prior to serving the
69 mandatory-minimum term.

70 “(g-2) A person shall be considered to have a prior conviction pursuant to subsection (f)
71 or (g) of this section if the person was previously convicted of a crime under the laws of any
72 other jurisdiction that involved conduct that would, if committed in the District of Columbia,
73 constitute a violation of subsection (f), (g), or (g-1) of this section or conduct that is substantially
74 similar to conduct constituting a violation under subsection (f), (g), or (g-1) of this section.”.
75 Sec. 3. Title 23 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
76 (a) Section 23-1322 is amended as follows:
77 (1) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
78 “(a-1) The judicial officer shall order the detention of a person charged with an
79 intrafamily offense as defined in § 16-1001(8) for a period of not more than 5 days, excluding
80 Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, pending a hearing under § 23-1329(b), and direct the attorney
81 for the government to notify the appropriate court, probation or parole official, or local or state
82 law enforcement official of the detention, if the judicial officer determines that the person
83 charged with an intrafamily offense was, at the time the offense was committed:
84 “(1) On release pending trial for a felony or misdemeanor under local, state, or
85 federal law involving an intrafamily offense as defined in § 16-1001(8); or
86 “(2) On release pending imposition or execution of sentence, appeal of sentence
87 or conviction, or completion of sentence, for any offense under local, state, or federal law
88 involving an intrafamily offense as defined in § 16-1001(8).”.
89 (2) Subsection (b)(1) is amended as follows:
90 (A) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and
91 inserting a semicolon in its place.

92 (B) Subparagraph (D) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
93 phrase “; or” in its place.
94 (C) A new subparagraph (E) is added to read as follows:
95 “(E) Any intrafamily offense as defined in § 16-1001(8) if, at the time of
96 the offense, the person:
97 “(i) Previously had been convicted, within 5 years of the date of
98 the offense, of an intrafamily offense as defined in § 16-1001(8) or a crime under the laws of any
99 other jurisdiction that involved conduct that, if committed in the District of Columbia, would
100 constitute an intrafamily offense as defined in § 16-1001(8); or
101 “(ii) Was subject to a temporary protection order or civil protection
102 order issued pursuant to § 16-1005 or any valid foreign protection order as defined in § 16-
103 1041(2).”.
104 (b) Section 23-1331(3) is amended as follows:
105 (1) Subparagraph (I) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and inserting a
106 semicolon in its place.
107 (2) Subparagraph (J) is amended by striking the period at the end and inserting the
108 phrase “; or” in its place.
109 (3) A new subparagraph (K) is added to read as follows:
110 “(K) Any of the following felony offenses committed against an intimate
111 partner as defined in § 16-1001(6A):
112 “(i) Threatening to kidnap or injure a person or damage his or her
113 property under section 1502 of An Act To assist State and local governments in reducing the
114 incidence of crime, to in- crease the effectiveness, fairness, and coordination of law enforcement

115 and criminal justice systems at all levels of government, and for other purposes approved Une
116 19, 1968 (82 Stat. 238; D.C. Official Code § 22-1810).
117 “(ii) Any felony offense under § 16-1005(g-1).”.
118 (c) Section 23-1329 is amended as follows:
119 (1) Subsection (b)(2) is amended to read as follows:
120 “(2) There shall arise a rebuttable presumption that no condition or combination
121 of conditions will assure the safety of any other person or the community if there is probable
122 cause to believe that, while on release, the person committed:
123 “(A) A dangerous or violent crime, as defined by § 23-1331;”
124 “(B) Any offense against the victim in a case in which the person was
125 conditionally released; or
126 “(C) An offense under the laws of any other jurisdiction substantially
127 similar to an offense described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph.”
128 (2) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
129 “(c) Contempt sanctions may be imposed if, upon a hearing and in accordance with
130 principles applicable to proceedings for criminal contempt, it is established that such person has
131 intentionally violated a condition of his release. Such contempt proceedings shall be expedited
132 and heard by the court without a jury. A judicial officer or a prosecutor may initiate a proceeding
133 for contempt under this section. Any person found guilty of criminal contempt for violation of a
134 condition of release shall:
135 “(1) Be fined no more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or incarcerated
136 for no more than 180 days, or both if the condition of release was imposed for a misdemeanor
137 offense, other than a misdemeanor offense set forth in subsection (c)(2) of this section; or

138 “(2) Be fined no more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or incarcerated
139 for no more than 5 years, or both if the condition of release was imposed for a felony offense,
140 misdemeanor intrafamily offense as defined in § 16-1001(8), or misdemeanor sexual offense as
141 set forth in the Anti-Sexual Abuse Act of 1994, effective May 23, 1995 (D.C. Law 10-257; D.C.
142 Official Code § 22-3001 et seq.).”.
143 (d) Section 23-1329a(b) is amended as follows:
144 (1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “Misdemeanor offense” and
145 inserting the phrase “Misdemeanor offense, other than a misdemeanor offense set forth in
146 paragraph (2) of this subsection” in its place.
147 (2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “Felony offense” and
148 inserting the phrase “Felony offense, misdemeanor intrafamily offense as defined in § 16-
149 1001(8), or misdemeanor sexual offense as set forth in Anti-Sexual Abuse Act of 1994, effective
150 May 23, 1995 (D.C. Law 10-257; D.C. Official Code § 22-3001 et seq.).”.
151 Sec. 4. The Secure D.C. Omnibus Amendment Act of 2024, effective June 8, 2024 (D.C.
152 Law 25-175; 71 DCR 7353) is amended as follows:
153 (a) Section 18(c)(2) is repealed.
154 (b) Section 30(k) is repealed.
155 Sec. 5. Chapter 19 of an Act To establish a code of law for the District of Columbia,
156 approved March 3, 1901 (31 Stat. 1189; codified in scattered sections of the D.C. Official Code),
157 is amended as follows:
158 (a) Section 812 (D.C. Official Code § 22-2001) is amended to read as follows:
159 “Sec. 812. Definitions.
160 “For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

161 “(a) “Abduct” means to interfere with an individual’s freedom of movement, whether by
162 moving or confining the individual.
163 “(b) “Bodily injury” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 22-3001(2).
164 “(c) “Confine” means to restrain, hold, imprison, or keep in place an individual for any
165 amount of time.
166 “(d) “Deception” means the use of a false representation, misrepresentation, or omission.
167 “(e) “Force” shall have the meaning as provided in § 22-3001(5).”.
168 (b) New sections 812a and 812b are added to read as follows:
169 “Sec. 812a. Kidnapping.
170 “(a) An actor commits kidnapping in the first-degree when the actor knowingly, by force,
171 threat, or deception:
172 “(1) Abducts an individual by either:
173 “(A) Moving the individual at least 20 feet, or
174 “(B) Confining the individual for at least 10 minutes; and
175 “(2) The actor’s intent is to:
176 “(A) Inflict bodily injury or death upon the individual;
177 “(B) Cause any person to believe that the individual will not be released
178 without suffering bodily injury, death, or an offense under the Anti-Sexual Abuse Act of 1994,
179 effective May 23, 1995 (D.C. Law 10-257; D.C. Official Code § 22-3001 et seq.);
180 “(C) Commit any felony or facilitate the commission of any felony or
181 flight thereafter; or
182 “(D) Receive financial gain.

183 “(b) An actor commits kidnapping in the second-degree when the actor knowingly, by
184 force, threat, or deception:
185 “(1) Abducts an individual by either:
186 “(A) Moving the individual at least 10 feet, or
187 “(B) Confining the individual for at least 5 minutes; and
188 “(2) The actor’s intent is to:
189 “(A) Inflict bodily injury or death upon the individual;
190 (B) Cause any person to believe that the individual will not be released
191 without suffering bodily injury, death, or an offense under the Anti-Sexual Abuse Act of 1994,
192 effective May 23, 1995 (D.C. Law 10-257; D.C. Official Code § 22-3001 et seq.);
193 “(C) Commit any criminal offense or facilitate the commission of any
194 criminal offense or flight thereafter; or
195 “(D) Receive financial gain.
196 “(c) An actor commits kidnapping in the third-degree when the actor knowingly, by
197 force, threat, or deception:
198 “(1) Abducts an individual by either:
199 “(A) Moving the individual any distance, or
200 “(B) Confining the individual for any period of time; and
201 “(2) The actor’s intent is to:
202 “(A) Inflict bodily injury or death upon the individual or cause any person
203 to believe that the individual will not be released without suffering bodily injury, death, or an
204 offense under the Anti-Sexual Abuse Act of 1994, effective May 23, 1995 (D.C. Law 10-257;
205 D.C. Official Code § 22-3001 et seq);

206 “(B) Commit any criminal offense or facilitate the commission of any
207 criminal offense or flight thereafter;
208 “(C) Receive financial gain; or
209 “(D) Restrict the complainant’s freedom of movement.
210 “(d) It is a defense to liability under subsections (a), (b), or (c) of this section that the
211 individual voluntarily consented to the abduction.
212 “(e)(1) Any actor convicted of first-degree kidnapping shall be fined not more than the
213 amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or be imprisoned for not more than 30 years, or both.
214 “(2) Any actor convicted of second-degree kidnapping shall be fined not more
215 than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or be imprisoned for not more than 15 years, or both.
216 “(3) Any actor convicted of third-degree kidnapping shall be fined not more than
217 the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or be imprisoned for not more than 180 days, or both.
218 “(f) Where multiple convictions for first degree kidnapping or second-degree kidnapping
219 and another offense arise from the same act or course of conduct, the sentencing court shall
220 follow the procedures specified in § 23-112.
221 “Sec. 812b. Attempt to commit kidnapping.
222 “Any person who attempts to commit an offense under section 812a shall be imprisoned
223 for not more than one half of the maximum prison sentence authorized for the offense, or fined
224 an amount not to exceed one half of the maximum fine authorized for the offense, or both.”.
225 (c) Section 824 (D.C. Official Code § 22-3302), is amended as follows:
226 (1) Subsection (a)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “or both” and inserting the phrase
227 “or both, except as provided in subsection (c) of this section” in its place.
228 (2) A new subsection (c) is added to read as follows:

229 “(c) Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be fined not more than
230 the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 10 years, or both, if the
231 person, while unlawfully present in the private dwelling, building, or other property, or part of
232 such dwelling, building, or other property, commits:
233 “(1) An assault pursuant to section 806 of Chapter 19 of an Act To establish a
234 code of law for the District of Columbia, approved March 3, 1901 (31 Stat. 1322; D.C. Official
235 Code § 22-404);
236 “(2) Stalking pursuant to section 503 of the Omnibus Public Safety and Justice
237 Amendment Act of 2009 effective September 10, 2009 (D.C. Law 18-88; D.C. Official Code §
238 22-3133);
239 “(3) A threat to do bodily harm pursuant to section 2 of An Act To confer
240 jurisdiction on the police court of the District of Columbia in certain cases, approved July 16,
241 1912 (37 Stat. 193; D.C. Official Code § 22-407); or
242 “(4) Any crime of violence, as that term is defined in § 23-1331(4).”.
243 Sec. 6. The District of Columbia Theft and White Collar Crimes Act of 1982, effective
244 December 1, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-164; D.C. Official Code § 22-3201 et seq.), is amended as
245 follows:
246 (a) New sections 206 and 207 are added to read as follows:
247 “Sec. 206. Enhanced penalty for crimes against pregnant victims.
248 “(a) Any person who commits any offense listed in subsection (b) of this section against
249 an individual, and who knew or consciously disregarded a substantial possibility that the
250 individual was pregnant at the time of the offense, may be punished by a fine of up to 1 1/2 times

251 the maximum fine otherwise authorized for the offense and may be imprisoned for a term of up
252 to 1 1/2 times the maximum term of imprisonment otherwise authorized for the offense, or both.
253 “(b) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall apply to the following offenses:
254 “(1) Any crime of violence, as that term is defined in § 23-1331(4);
255 “(2) A threat to kidnap or injure or physically damage the property of any person
256 under section 1502 of the Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968, approved June
257 19, 1968 (82 Stat. 238; D.C. Official Code § 22-1810);
258 “(3) A threat to do bodily harm pursuant to section 2 of An Act To confer
259 jurisdiction on the police court of the District of Columbia in certain cases, approved July 16,
260 1912 (37 Stat. 193; D.C. Official Code § 22-407);
261 “(4) Stalking pursuant to section 503 of the Omnibus Public Safety and Justice
262 Amendment Act of 2009, effective September 10, 2009 (D.C. Law 18-88; D.C. Official Code §
263 22-3133),
264 “(5) Assault pursuant to section 806 of An Act To establish a code of law for the
265 District of Columbia, approved March 3, 1901 (31 Stat. 1322; D.C. Official Code § 22-404); or
266 “(6) An attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the foregoing offenses.
267 “Sec. 207. Enhanced penalty for intrafamily violence committed in the presence of a
268 child.
269 “(a) A person who commits an intrafamily offense listed in subsection (b) of this section
270 in the presence of the child, or where the child witnesses the offense, and who is at least 4 years
271 older than the child, shall be imprisoned for not more than 5 years and, in addition, may be fined
272 in an amount not more than the amount set forth in the Criminal Fine Proportionality

273 Amendment Act of 2012, effective June 11, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-317; D.C. Official Code § 22-
274 3571.01).
275 “(b) Subsection (a) shall apply to the following intrafamily offenses:
276 “(1) An offense against an intimate partner, a family member, or a household
277 member that is punishable as:
278 “(A) Any crime of violence, as that term is defined in § 23-1331(4);
279 “(B) A threat to kidnap or injure or physically damage the property of any
280 person pursuant to section 1502 of the Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968,
281 approved June 19, 1968 (82 Stat. 238; D.C. Official Code § 22-1810);
282 “(C) A threat to do bodily harm pursuant to section 2 of An Act To confer
283 jurisdiction on the police court of the District of Columbia in certain cases, approved July 16,
284 1912 (37 Stat. 193; D.C. Official Code § 22-407);
285 “(D) Stalking pursuant to section 503 of the Omnibus Public Safety and
286 Justice Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Law 18-88; D.C. Official Code § 22-3133);
287 “(E) Assault pursuant to section 806 of An Act to establish a code of law
288 for the District of Columbia, approved March 3, 1901 (31 Stat. 1322; D.C. Official Code § 22-
289 404); or
290 “(F) Any attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the foregoing offenses.
291 “(2) An offense punishable as cruelty to animals, under section 2 of Chapter 106
292 of the Acts of the Legislative Assembly, approved August 23, 1871; (D.C. Official Code § 22-
293 1002), against an animal that an intimate partner, family member, or household member owns,
294 possesses, or controls.

295 “(c) It is an affirmative defense for violations under this section that the accused
296 reasonably believed that the child was not present at the time of the offense and that the child
297 would not be able to witness the offense. This defense shall be established by a preponderance of
298 the evidence.
299 “(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “child” means a person under 16 years of
300 age at the time of the offense.”.
301 Sec. 7. Section 389 of the Revised Statutes of the District of Columbia (D.C. Official
302 Code § 5-113.06) is amended as follows:
303 (a) Subsection (a) is amended by:
304 (1) Striking the phrase “subsection (c)” and inserting the phrase “subsection (d)”
305 in its place; and
306 (2) Striking the phrase “section 386” and inserting the phrase “section 386(a)” in
307 its place.
308 (b) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
309 “(d)(1) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the following shall be
310 withheld from public inspection:
311 “(A) The actual addresses of participants in the Address Confidentiality
312 Program established by section 102 of the Address Confidentiality Act of 2018, approved July 3,
313 2018 (D.C. Law 22-118; D.C. Official Code § 4-555.02); and
314 “(B) The name and address or residence of a complainant who is alleged
315 to be the victim of or witness to a criminal offense.”.
316 “(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not create any limitation on or
317 expansion of the scope of discovery in a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding.”.

318 Sec. 8. Fiscal impact statement.
319 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
320 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
321 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
322 Sec. 9. Effective date.
323 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
324 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 60-day period of Congressional review as
325 provided in section 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
326 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(2)), and publication in the District of
327 Columbia Register.

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: April 15, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Protecting Victims Amendment Act of 2026
REFERENCE: Draft bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on March 30,
2026
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 budget and proposed fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill.
Background
Chapter 10 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Official Code governs proceedings regarding
intrafamily offenses. Current law1 states that violating temporary protection orders (TPOs), civil
protection orders (CPOs), or valid foreign protection orders (FPOs) is punishable as criminal
contempt, chargeable as a misdemeanor offense, and subject to the maximum fine allowed under the
law2, up to 180 days in jail, or both. The bill amends the law to enhance penalties for repeat offenders.
A person convicted of violating a protection order who has one or more prior3, separate convictions
for the same type of offense must receive the maximum fine allowed2 and a mandatory minimum
prison term of 1 year, up to a maximum of 5 years. The bill prohibits the reduction of the mandatory
minimum and disallows the use of probation, early release, or suspended sentencing before the full
year is served.
1 D.C. Official Code § 16–1005.
2 D.C. Official Code § 22–3571.01 provides the schedule of fines for criminal offenses.
3 A previous conviction counts as a prior offense not only if it occurred in the District, but also if it occurred in
another jurisdiction for conduct that would be considered the same or substantially similar to violations of
those subsections.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Protecting Victims Amendment Act of 2026”, Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on
March 30, 2026
The bill requires a judicial officer to detain a person charged with an intrafamily offense for up to five
days (excluding weekends and holidays) until a hearing can be held. This non-discretionary hold is
only required for individuals charged in an intrafamily offense who were, at the time of the offense,
released pending trial or sentencing in another intrafamily offense case4. The judicial officer must
also notify the appropriate authorities if, at the time of the offense, the person was already on release
while awaiting trial for another intrafamily offense; or on release while awaiting sentencing, serving
a sentence, or appealing a conviction for an intrafamily offense.
Current law5 requires that a judicial officer hold a hearing to determine whether any release
conditions can reasonably ensure the defendant’s appearance and protect the safety of others and
the community. This hearing is required when the case involves: a violent crime6; an obstruction of
justice–related offense; a serious risk that the defendant will obstruct justice or threaten or harm a
witness or juror; and/or a serious risk that the defendant will flee. The bill expands the reasons a
hearing is required to include that an offense committed against an intimate partner qualifies for
enhanced treatment if, at the time of the offense, the perpetrator had a prior conviction within the
previous five years for an intrafamily or comparable offense, or was subject to a TPO, CPO or FPO.
The bill expands the definition for dangerous crime7 to include felony offenses committed against an
intimate partner; threatening to kidnap or injure a person or damage property; and any felony
intrafamily offense.
Current law8 provides for proceedings to revoke an individual’s release and place the individual in
temporary custody upon initiation by the Pretrial Services Agency, the prosecutor, or the court, and
permits a judicial officer to issue an arrest warrant for violations of release conditions9. The bill
authorizes the imposition of criminal contempt sanctions when the court determines, after an
expedited non‑jury hearing, that a defendant intentionally violated a release condition. Contempt
proceedings may be initiated by either the prosecutor or a judicial officer. Penalties depend on the
underlying offense for which release was granted; violations related to misdemeanors carry up to
180 days’ imprisonment and a fine2, while violations tied to felonies, misdemeanor intrafamily
offenses, or misdemeanor sexual offenses carry up to five years’ imprisonment and the same
maximum fine2.
The bill makes permanent certain expiring provisions in the Secure DC Omnibus Amendment Act of
2024,10 including:
Pre-trial detention provisions of a child relating to substantial probability that the child committed
certain crimes.
• Edits that replaced certain references to “crime or crime of violence” with “crime.”
• Specifying that the term “crime of violence” is defined in D.C. Official Code § 23‑1331(4).
4 All others would still be under the optional hold pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 23-1322(a)(1).
5 D.C. Official Code § 23–1322(b)(1).
6 Defined in D.C. Official Code § 23-1331(4).
7 D.C. Official Code § 23–1331(3).
8 D.C. Official Code § 23–1329.
9 Either probable cause that the defendant committed an offense while on release, or clear and convincing
evidence that another release condition was violated; and either that no condition or combination of
conditions will reasonably assure the defendant’s appearance and the safety of the community.
10 D.C. Law 25-175, effective June 8, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-175; 71 DCR 7353).
Page 2 of 4

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Protecting Victims Amendment Act of 2026”, Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on
March 30, 2026
• Requiring judges provide a written explanation when releasing a person who falls under a
rebuttable presumption of detention.
• Extending permissible continuances to 45 days.
• Replacing the requirement of showing “substantial probability” with “probable cause.”
• Expanding the types of weapons covered that would restrict pretrial release for first degree
murder, second degree murder, and assault with intent to kill while armed cases or after
conviction by adding “other deadly or dangerous weapon.”
• Retaining the expansion of the definition of “dangerous crime” to include any felony under
Title 22, Chapter 30 (sexual abuse offenses).
• Expanding the definition of “crime of violence” in paragraph (4) to include misdemeanor
sexual abuse, misdemeanor sexual abuse of a child or minor, and strangulation.
The bill adds definitions for specific terms11, establishes a new section under criminal offenses
related to kidnapping, and defines three levels of kidnapping based on distance, the duration of
confinement, and the kidnapper’s intentions.
• First‑degree kidnapping occurs when an individual knowingly uses force, threats, or lies to
take or confine another person; moves them 20 feet or more or keeps them 10 minutes or
more; and intends to cause serious harm or death, make someone believe serious harm or
death will happen, commit or help with a felony or the escape afterward, receive money or
some other financial benefit, and/or limit the person’s ability to move freely. This degree of
kidnapping is punishable with a maximum of 30 years in prison and/or a fine2.
• Second‑degree kidnapping occurs when an individual moves a person 10 feet or more or
keeps them 5 minutes or more, and intends to cause serious harm or death, make someone
believe serious harm or death will happen, commit or help with any crime or escape
afterward, and/or receive money or financial benefit. This degree of kidnapping is punishable
with a maximum of 15 years in prison and/or a fine2.
• Third‑degree kidnapping occurs when an individual moves or keeps a person for any distance
or any amount of time, and intends to cause serious harm or death, make someone believe
serious harm or death will happen, commit or help with any crime or escape afterward,
receive money or financial benefit, and/or limit the person’s movement. This degree of
kidnapping is punishable with a maximum of 180 days in jail and/or a fine2.
The bill clarifies that consent12 is a defense to any kidnapping charge. If an individual is convicted of
kidnapping and other related crimes from the same incident, the court must follow special sentencing
rules. The bill also provides penalties for kidnapping attempts13.
The bill amends current law14 related to unlawful entry to add that a person who is unlawfully inside
someone else’s property can be punished by up to 10 years in prison, a fine2, or both if, while inside,
they commit or threaten an assault, engage in stalking, or commit any violent crime6.
11 That is, abduct, bodily injury, confine, deception, and force.
12 That is, that the person agreed to go or stay.
13 Not more than half of the maximum prison sentence authorized for the offense and, in addition, a fine not to
exceed half of the maximum fine authorized.
14 D.C. Official Code § 22-3302.
Page 3 of 4

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Protecting Victims Amendment Act of 2026”, Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on
March 30, 2026
The bill provides enhanced penalties for crimes against pregnant victims15 and intrafamily violence
committed in the presence of a child16.
District law17 provides for the Address Confidentiality Program (ACP), administered by the Office of
Victim Services and Justice Grants (OVSJG). It authorizes a substitute address for victims of domestic
violence, sexual offenses, trafficking, or stalking, to protect their actual address from FOIA18. District
law19 also withholds ACP participants’ information from public inspection as required for records
maintained by the Metropolitan Police Department (MPD). The bill provides that victims of, or
witnesses to, a criminal offense may be added to the ACP.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 budget and proposed fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill.
The bill primarily impacts penalties for intrafamily offenses. Currently, the federal government
employs and pays the costs of judicial proceedings, including prosecution of adults for felonies and
some misdemeanors, public defense, and the incarceration of convicted adults. The fiscal impact
statement is not required to assess any impacts of the bill on federal agencies. The population size
of affected persons is small and should not meaningfully impact the number of hearings at Superior
Court or people detained in adult and juvenile facilities. The Department of Corrections and the
Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services can absorb any additional fiscal impact due to the
expectation that their detention facilities may operate at full capacity. The Office of the Attorney
General and MPD anticipate no impacts from the bill.
15 One and a half times the maximum fine otherwise authorized for the offense and imprisonment for a term
of up to 1.5 times the maximum term of imprisonment otherwise authorized for the offense; applicable for
any crime of violence; threats to kidnap or injure or physically damage the property of any person; threats to
do bodily harm; stalking, assault, or an attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the foregoing offenses.
16 The individual must be at least 20 years of age and is subject to imprisonment for not more than 5 years
and a possible fine; applicable for applicable for any crime of violence; threats to kidnap or injure or
physically damage the property of any person; threats to do bodily harm; stalking, assault, or an attempt or
conspiracy to commit any of the foregoing offenses; and includes animal cruelty.
17 D.C. Official Code § 4-555.02.
18 Freedom of Information Act, subchapter II of Chapter 5 of Title 2 of D.C. Official Code.
19 D.C. Official Code § 5–113.06.
Page 4 of 4

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: April 23, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Draft Bill, the “Protecting Victims Amendment Act of
2026”
(AE-26-266)
___________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Suite 409, Washington, D.C. 20004
Phone (202) 262-6402 Email: adele.el-khouri@dc.gov